Massachusetts, session 194th, H2072.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 41 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 108A the following section: -
Section 108A½. (a) A municipality shall be considered an employer for purposes of
section 1 of chapter 151.
(b) In a city or town that accepts subsection (c), subsection (a) shall not apply.
(c) (1) In a municipality with a chief executive officer, the municipality may accept this
subsection upon a majority vote of the legislative body of the municipality with the approval of
the chief executive officer.
of 2

(2) In a municipality without a chief executive officer, the municipality may accept this
subsection upon a majority vote of the legislative body of the municipality.
of 2